Florida, session 2026, HB927.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
113
114 Section 1. Section 125.022, Florida Statutes, is amended
115 to read:
116 125.022 Development permits and orders; development
117 preapplication consulting services program required.—
118 (1)(a) By January 1, 2027, each county with a population
119 of 75,000 or greater shall create and implement a program for
120 the purpose of making available development preapplication
121 consultation services at an applicant's request. This subsection
122 may not be construed to affect or require the modification of a
123 county program that makes available the same or substantially
124 similar development preapplication consulting services to an
125 applicant for a development permit or development order,
Page 5 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
126 including a program that requires mandatory preapplication
127 meetings for specified types of developments, if such county
128 program exists on or before July 1, 2026.
129 1. The preapplication consultation services authorized in
130 this subsection are limited to those applications for permits as
131 defined in s. 163.3169.
132 2. The county may use a qualified contractor or a
133 qualified contractor firm as defined in s. 163.3169 to fulfill
134 the preapplication consultation services required in this
135 subsection.
136 (b) A development preapplication consultation services
137 program must, at minimum, provide all of the following:
138 1. The minimum information that must be submitted in an
139 application for a permit as defined in s. 163.3169.
140 2. The review and precertification of completeness of the
141 application and all related documents, including site
142 engineering plans or site plans or their functional equivalent,
143 or plats, and their compliance with all relevant existing land
144 development regulations.
145 (c) If an applicant chooses to use the development
146 preapplication consultation services program, the county, upon
147 receipt of the proposed development application, shall confirm
148 receipt, verify completeness, and issue a written notification
149 to the applicant indicating that all required information has
150 been submitted, or specify in writing with particularity any
Page 6 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
151 deficiencies in the application, within 5 business days. If the
152 application is deficient, the applicant has 30 days to address
153 the deficiencies by submitting the required additional
154 information. If the county fails to issue the written
155 notification within 5 business days, the application is deemed
156 complete by operation of law without conditions, and the county
157 must process the application as required in paragraph (d).
158 (d)1. Upon receipt of the applicant's completed
159 application, the county must process the application for final
160 action and must approve, approve with conditions, or deny the
161 application within 45 days after submission of a complete
162 application, except the county may not review again those plans
163 specified in subparagraph (b)2.
164 2. If the county fails to take final action to approve,
165 approve with conditions, or deny the application within 45 days,
166 the applicant shall notify the county in writing. If the county
167 fails to respond within 10 days, the application is deemed
168 approved by operation of law without conditions, and the
169 applicant is entitled to proceed with the proposed activity or
170 development as though the county had granted unconditional
171 approval. Approval pursuant to this subparagraph may not be
172 construed to relieve the applicant of the obligation to comply
173 with all other applicable federal, state, and local laws,
174 regulations, and ordinances.
175 (2) If an applicant for a development permit or
Page 7 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
176 development order is not eligible, does not request, or elects
177 not to use the county's development preapplication consulting
178 services program pursuant to subsection (1), all of the
179 following requirements shall apply:
180 (a)(1) A county shall specify in writing the minimum
181 information that must be submitted in an application for a
182 zoning approval, rezoning approval, subdivision approval,
183 certification, special exception, or variance. A county shall
184 make the minimum information available for inspection and
185 copying at the location where the county receives applications
186 for development permits and orders, provide the information to
187 the applicant at a preapplication meeting, or post the
188 information on the county's website.
189 (b)1.(2) Within 5 business days after receiving an
190 application for approval of a development permit or development
191 order, a county shall confirm receipt of the application using
192 contact information provided by the applicant. Within 30 days
193 after receiving an application for approval of a development
194 permit or development order, a county must review the
195 application for completeness and issue a written notification to
196 the applicant indicating that all required information is
197 submitted or specify in writing with particularity any areas
198 that are deficient. If the application is deficient, the
199 applicant has 30 days to address the deficiencies by submitting
200 the required additional information.
Page 8 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
201 2. For applications that do not require final action
202 through a quasi-judicial hearing or a public hearing, the county
203 must approve, approve with conditions, or deny the application
204 for a development permit or development order within 120 days
205 after the county has deemed the application complete.
206 3. For applications that require final action through a
207 quasi-judicial hearing or a public hearing, the county must
208 approve, approve with conditions, or deny the application for a
209 development permit or development order within 180 days after
210 the county has deemed the application complete.
211 4. Both parties may agree in writing or in a public
212 meeting or hearing to an extension of time, particularly in the
213 event of a force majeure or other extraordinary circumstance. An
214 approval, approval with conditions, or denial of the application
215 for a development permit or development order must include
216 written findings supporting the county's decision.
217
218 The timeframes contained in this paragraph subsection do not
219 apply in an area of critical state concern, as designated in s.
220 380.0552. The timeframes contained in this paragraph subsection
221 restart if an applicant makes a substantive change to the
222 application. As used in this paragraph subsection, the term
223 "substantive change" means an applicant-initiated change of 15
224 percent or more in the proposed density, intensity, or square
225 footage of a parcel.
Page 9 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
226 (c)1.(3)(a) When reviewing an application for a
227 development permit or development order that is certified by a
228 professional listed in s. 403.0877, a county may not request
229 additional information from the applicant more than three times,
230 unless the applicant waives the limitation in writing.
231 2.(b) If a county makes a request for additional
232 information and the applicant submits the required additional
233 information within 30 days after receiving the request, the
234 county must review the application for completeness and issue a
235 letter indicating that all required information has been
236 submitted or specify with particularity any areas that are
237 deficient within 30 days after receiving the additional
238 information.
239 3.(c) If a county makes a second request for additional
240 information and the applicant submits the required additional
241 information within 30 days after receiving the request, the
242 county must review the application for completeness and issue a
243 letter indicating that all required information has been
244 submitted or specify with particularity any areas that are
245 deficient within 10 days after receiving the additional
246 information.
247 4.(d) Before a third request for additional information,
248 the applicant must be offered a meeting to attempt to resolve
249 outstanding issues. If a county makes a third request for
250 additional information and the applicant submits the required
Page 10 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
251 additional information within 30 days after receiving the
252 request, the county must deem the application complete within 10
253 days after receiving the additional information or proceed to
254 process the application for approval or denial unless the
255 applicant waived the county's limitation in writing as described
256 in subparagraph 1. paragraph (a).
257 5.(e) Except as provided in subsection (4) subsection (7),
258 if the applicant believes the request for additional information
259 is not authorized by ordinance, rule, statute, or other legal
260 authority, the county, at the applicant's request, shall proceed
261 to process the application for approval or denial.
262 (d)(4) A county must issue a refund to an applicant equal
263 to:
264 1.(a) Ten percent of the application fee if the county
265 fails to issue written notification of completeness or written
266 specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days after
267 receiving the application.
268 2.(b) Ten percent of the application fee if the county
269 fails to issue a written notification of completeness or written
270 specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days after
271 receiving the additional information pursuant to subparagraph
272 (c)2. paragraph (3)(b).
273 3.(c) Twenty percent of the application fee if the county
274 fails to issue a written notification of completeness or written
275 specification of areas of deficiency within 10 days after
Page 11 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
276 receiving the additional information pursuant to subparagraph
277 (c)3. paragraph (3)(c).
278 4.(d) Fifty percent of the application fee if the county
279 fails to approve, approves with conditions, or denies the
280 application within 30 days after conclusion of the 120-day
281 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)2. or the 180-day
282 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)3. subsection (2).
283 5.(e) One hundred percent of the application fee if the
284 county fails to approve, approves with conditions, or denies an
285 application 31 days or more after conclusion of the 120-day
286 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)2. or the 180-day
287 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)3. subsection (2).
288
289 A county is not required to issue a refund if the applicant and
290 the county agree to an extension of time, the delay is caused by
291 the applicant, or the delay is attributable to a force majeure
292 or other extraordinary circumstance.
293 (e)(5) When a county denies an application for a
294 development permit or development order, the county shall give
295 written notice to the applicant. The notice must include a
296 citation to the applicable portions of an ordinance, rule,
297 statute, or other legal authority for the denial of the permit
298 or order.
299 (3)(6) As used in this section, the terms "development
300 permit" and "development order" have the same meaning as in s.
Page 12 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
301 163.3164, but do not include building permits.
302 (4)(7) For any development permit application filed with
303 the county after July 1, 2012, a county may not require as a
304 condition of processing or issuing a development permit or
305 development order that an applicant obtain a permit or approval
306 from any state or federal agency unless the agency has issued a
307 final agency action that denies the federal or state permit
308 before the county action on the local development permit.
309 (5)(8) Issuance of a development permit or development
310 order by a county does not in any way create any rights on the
311 part of the applicant to obtain a permit from a state or federal
312 agency and does not create any liability on the part of the
313 county for issuance of the permit if the applicant fails to
314 obtain requisite approvals or fulfill the obligations imposed by
315 a state or federal agency or undertakes actions that result in a
316 violation of state or federal law. A county shall attach such a
317 disclaimer to the issuance of a development permit and shall
318 include a permit condition that all other applicable state or
319 federal permits be obtained before commencement of the
320 development.
321 (6)(9) This section does not prohibit a county from
322 providing information to an applicant regarding what other state
323 or federal permits may apply.
324 Section 2. Section 163.3169, Florida Statutes, is created
325 to read:
Page 13 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
326 163.3169 Using qualified contractors in development order
327 preapplication review.—
328 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
329 (a) "Applicant" means a person or legal entity having a
330 legal or equitable ownership interest in real property, or an
331 authorized agent acting on behalf of such person or entity,
332 which applies for a land development approval from the local
333 government pursuant to this section.
334 (b) "Application" means a properly completed and submitted
335 request for a permit, as defined herein, on behalf of an
336 applicant which includes an affidavit from a qualified
337 contractor as required by this section. The term does not
338 include plans or permits as reviewed under s. 553.791.
339 (c) "Conflict of interest" has the same meaning as in s.
340 112.312 and includes conflicts of interest recognized under
341 applicable licensing or certification standards applicable to
342 the qualified contractor.
343 (d) "Development services office" means the entity,
344 office, division, or department of a local government which is
345 responsible for reviewing applications for compliance with the
346 local government's land development regulations and other
347 applicable federal, state, and local requirements. This office
348 may be substantively identical to or housed within the local
349 government's planning and zoning department.
350 (e) "Development services official" means the individual
Page 14 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
351 in the development services office of the governing jurisdiction
352 who is responsible for the direct regulatory administration or
353 supervision of the review and approval process required to
354 indicate compliance with applicable land development
355 regulations. The term includes any duly authorized designee of
356 such person. This individual may be the executive director of
357 the governing body of a local government or the division
358 director of the local government's planning and zoning
359 department.
360 (f) "Final plat" has the same meaning as in s. 177.073.
361 (g) "Governing body" has the same meaning as in s.
362 163.3164.
363 (h) "Land development regulations" has the same meaning as
364 in s. 163.3164, but excludes building permits and plans subject
365 to s. 553.791.
366 (i) "Local government" means:
367 1. A county that has 75,000 or more residents, but does
368 not include a county subject to s. 380.0552; or
369 2. A municipality that has 10,000 or more residents.
370 (j) "Permit" means an authorization, approval, or grant by
371 a local governing body which authorizes the development of land
372 for any site plan or development plan approval, or any
373 subdivision approval, as defined in this section.
374 (k) "Plans" has the same meaning as in s. 177.073.
375 (l) "Plat or replat" has the same meaning as in s.
Page 15 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
376 177.031(14).
377 (m) "Preapplication review" means the analysis of a permit
378 conducted by a qualified contractor to ensure compliance with a
379 comprehensive plan, chapter 177, and applicable land development
380 regulations, and which is part of the application as authorized
381 under this section.
382 (n) "Preliminary plat" has the same meaning as in 177.073.
383 (o) "Qualified contractor" means the individual or firm
384 that has demonstrated knowledge of and experience with the types
385 of permits or development approvals specified in this section.
386 The term includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:
387 1. An engineer or engineering firm licensed under chapter
388 471.
389 2. A surveyor or mapper, or a surveyor's or mapper's firm,
390 licensed under chapter 472.
391 3. An architect or architecture firm licensed under part I
392 of chapter 481.
393 4. A landscape architect or a landscape architecture firm
394 registered under part II of chapter 481.
395 5. A planner certified by the American Institute of
396 Certified Planners with at least 5 years of relevant government
397 experience or at least 10 years of experience as an urban
398 planner if not certified.
399 (p) "Qualified contractor firm" means a business
400 organization, including a corporation, partnership, business
Page 16 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
401 trust, or other legal entity, which offers services under this
402 section to the public through licensees who act as agents,
403 employees, officers, or partners of the firm. A person who is
404 licensed as an engineer under chapter 471; a surveyor or mapper
405 licensed under chapter 472; an architect licensed under part I
406 of chapter 481; a landscape architect licensed under part II of
407 chapter 481; or who is certified by the American Institute of
408 Certified Planners with at least 5 years of relevant government
409 experience, or at least 10 years of relevant experience as an
410 urban planner if not certified, may act as a qualified
411 contractor for an agent, employee, or officer of the qualified
412 contractor firm.
413 (q) "Site plan or development plan approval" means a site
414 development proposal, or its functional equivalent, including a
415 modification to an existing development approval, which is
416 expressly designated by the local government for administrative
417 review and approval by local government staff or a designated
418 administrative official, without the requirement of approval by
419 an appointed review board or a governing body and which does not
420 materially increase density, intensity, traffic, infrastructure
421 demand, environmental impacts, or significant offsite impacts,
422 and therefore does not require full site plan review or
423 discretionary policy review. The term includes approvals or
424 permits governed by objective, nondiscretionary standards that
425 are designated by the local government for administrative
Page 17 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
426 approval by local government staff or an administrative official
427 and which also includes, but is not limited to approvals or
428 permits related to trees, signs, landscaping, and minor
429 modifications.
430 (r) "Subdivision approval" or its functional equivalent,
431 including a modification, means an administrative review process
432 applicable to the division of land into a limited number of lots
433 which does not create new public streets or require significant
434 public infrastructure improvements and does not materially
435 increase development impacts. The term applies only to approvals
436 expressly designated by the local government for administrative
437 review and approval by local government staff or a designated
438 administrator without the requirement of approval by an
439 appointed review board or a governing body. A subdivision
440 qualifies under this definition if it involves a number of lots
441 as specified by the local government, complies with all
442 applicable zoning, dimensional, access utility, and
443 environmental standards, and can be served by existing public
444 facilities or approved private systems, allowing the subdivision
445 to be reviewed for compliance with objective standards of land
446 development code and approved by local government staff or a
447 designated administrative official without requiring
448 discretionary policy determinations.
449 (2) REGISTRY.—
450 (a) By January 1, 2027, a local government shall establish
Page 18 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
451 a registry of at least four qualified contractors or two
452 qualified contractor firms which the governing body shall use to
453 supplement the local government's staff resources in ways
454 determined by the governing body upon the written request by an
455 applicant for fulfilling:
456 1. The preapplication consultation services for permits
457 under s. 125.022(1) and s. 166.033(1);
458 2. The requirements of s. 177.073 for processing and
459 expediting the review of an application for a preliminary plat
460 or any plans related to such application; or
461 3. The requirements of s. 177.071 requiring the
462 administrative approval of a plat or replat.
463 (b) A qualified contractor or a qualified contractor firm
464 on the registry which is hired pursuant to this section may not
465 have a conflict of interest. If a prohibitive conflict of
466 interest exists, the applicant may use an otherwise qualified
467 contractor.
468 (c) A local government may enter into an agreement with
469 another local government for the purpose of using public
470 employees who meet the requirements for a qualified contractor
471 to satisfy the minimum numerical requirements for qualified
472 contractors for the registry. A local government may not add its
473 own employees to its own registry.
474 (d) If a local government fails to establish or maintain
475 the registry, an applicant may, at its sole discretion, retain a
Page 19 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
476 qualified contractor or a qualified contractor firm of the
477 applicant's choosing to provide preapplication consultation
478 services, provided that the selected qualified contractor or
479 qualified contractor firm does not have a conflict of interest.
480 If a conflict of interest is identified after selection, the
481 applicant must promptly replace the qualified contractor or
482 qualified contractor firm with one that has no conflict of
483 interest.
484 (e) The local government may not condition, deny, or delay
485 the applicant's selection or use of such qualified contractor or
486 qualified contractor firm, and the applicant is responsible for
487 all fees and costs associated with the qualified contractor or
488 qualified contractor firm used in this manner.
489 (f) If an applicant uses a qualified contractor or a
490 qualified contractor firm for such purpose, the local government
491 must provide access to public records and information reasonably
492 necessary to perform preapplication consultation services. This
493 paragraph does not authorize the disclosure of records that are
494 confidential or exempt from public inspection or copying under
495 chapter 119 or any other applicable law, and access to such
496 records is provided only to the extent permitted by law. This
497 paragraph may not be construed to require a local government to
498 violate the licensing terms of proprietary software or related
499 vendor agreements.
500 (3) APPLICABILITY; HISTORIC PRESERVATION.—
Page 20 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
501 (a) This section does not apply to an application for a
502 permit if the property that is the subject of the application
503 is:
504 1. Individually listed in the National Register of
505 Historic Places or is a contributing property within a National
506 Register-listed historic district;
507 2. Designated as a local historic landmark, historic
508 resource, or part of a locally designated historic district
509 under a duly adopted local historic preservation ordinance; or
510 3. Subject to binding historic preservation review or
511 approval under federal, state, or local law, including review by
512 a local historic preservation board or commission.
513 (b) If an application encompasses multiple parcels or
514 improvements, this subsection applies only to the portion of the
515 application that relates to property described in paragraph (a).
516 This subsection may not be construed to prohibit the use of a
517 qualified contractor for the portions of an application that do
518 not involve the property listed in paragraph (a).
519 Section 3. Section 166.033, Florida Statutes, is amended
520 to read:
521 166.033 Development permits and orders; development
522 preapplication consulting services program required.—
523 (1)(a) By January 1, 2027, each municipality with a
524 population of 10,000 or greater shall create and implement a
525 program for the purpose of making available development
Page 21 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
526 preapplication consultation services at an applicant's request.
527 This subsection may not be construed to affect or require the
528 modification of a municipal program that makes available the
529 same or substantially similar development preapplication
530 consulting services to an applicant for a development permit or
531 development order, including a program that requires mandatory
532 preapplication meetings for specified types of developments, if
533 such municipal program exists on or before July 1, 2026.
534 1. The preapplication consultation services authorized in
535 this subsection are limited to those applications for permits as
536 defined in s. 163.3169.
537 2. The municipality may use a qualified contractor or a
538 qualified contractor firm as defined in s. 163.3169 to fulfill
539 the preapplication consultation services required in this
540 subsection.
541 (b) A development preapplication consultation services
542 program must, at minimum, provide all of the following:
543 1. The minimum information that must be submitted in an
544 application for a permit as defined in s. 163.3169.
545 2. The review and precertification of completeness of the
546 application and all related documents, including site
547 engineering plans or site plans or their functional equivalent,
548 or plats, and their compliance with all relevant existing land
549 development regulations.
550 (c) If an applicant chooses to use the development
Page 22 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
551 preapplication consultation services program, the municipality,
552 upon receipt of the proposed development application, shall
553 confirm receipt, verify completeness, and issue a written
554 notification to the applicant indicating that all required
555 information has been submitted, or specify in writing with
556 particularity any deficiencies within 5 business days. If the
557 application is deficient, the applicant has 30 days to address
558 the deficiencies by submitting the required information. If the
559 municipality fails to issue the written notification within 5
560 business days, the application is deemed complete by operation
561 of law without conditions, and the municipality must process the
562 application as required in paragraph (d).
563 (d)1. Upon receipt of the applicant's completed
564 application, the municipality must process the application for
565 final action and must approve, approve with conditions, or deny
566 the application within 45 days after submission of a complete
567 application, except the municipality may not review again those
568 plans specified in subparagraph (b)2.
569 2. If the municipality fails to take final action to
570 approve, approve with conditions, or deny the application within
571 the 45 days, the applicant shall notify the municipality in
572 writing. If the municipality fails to respond within 10 days,
573 the application is deemed approved by operation of law without
574 conditions, and the applicant is entitled to proceed with the
575 proposed activity or development as though the municipality had
Page 23 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
576 granted unconditional approval. Approval pursuant to this
577 subparagraph may not be construed to relieve the applicant of
578 the obligation to comply with all other applicable federal,
579 state, and local laws, regulations, and ordinances.
580 (2) If an applicant for a development permit or
581 development order is not eligible, does not request, or elects
582 not to use the municipality's development preapplication
583 consulting services program pursuant to subsection (1), all of
584 the following requirements shall apply:
585 (a)(1) A municipality shall specify in writing the minimum
586 information that must be submitted for an application for a
587 zoning approval, rezoning approval, subdivision approval,
588 certification, special exception, or variance. A municipality
589 shall make the minimum information available for inspection and
590 copying at the location where the municipality receives
591 applications for development permits and orders, provide the
592 information to the applicant at a preapplication meeting, or
593 post the information on the municipality's website.
594 (b)1.(2) Within 5 business days after receiving an
595 application for approval of a development permit or development
596 order, a municipality shall confirm receipt of the application
597 using contact information provided by the applicant. Within 30
598 days after receiving an application for approval of a
599 development permit or development order, a municipality must
600 review the application for completeness and issue a written
Page 24 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
601 notification to the applicant indicating that all required
602 information is submitted or specify in writing with
603 particularity any areas that are deficient. If the application
604 is deficient, the applicant has 30 days to address the
605 deficiencies by submitting the required additional information.
606 2. For applications that do not require final action
607 through a quasi-judicial hearing or a public hearing, the
608 municipality must approve, approve with conditions, or deny the
609 application for a development permit or development order within
610 120 days after the municipality has deemed the application
611 complete.
612 3. For applications that require final action through a
613 quasi-judicial hearing or a public hearing, the municipality
614 must approve, approve with conditions, or deny the application
615 for a development permit or development order within 180 days
616 after the municipality has deemed the application complete.
617 4. Both parties may agree in writing or in a public
618 meeting or hearing to an extension of time, particularly in the
619 event of a force majeure or other extraordinary circumstance. An
620 approval, approval with conditions, or denial of the application
621 for a development permit or development order must include
622 written findings supporting the municipality's decision.
623
624 The timeframes contained in this paragraph subsection do not
625 apply in an area of critical state concern, as designated in s.
Page 25 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
626 380.0552 or chapter 28-36, Florida Administrative Code. The
627 timeframes contained in this paragraph subsection restart if an
628 applicant makes a substantive change to the application. As used
629 in this paragraph subsection, the term "substantive change"
630 means an applicant-initiated change of 15 percent or more in the
631 proposed density, intensity, or square footage of a parcel.
632 (c)1.(3)(a) When reviewing an application for a
633 development permit or development order that is certified by a
634 professional listed in s. 403.0877, a municipality may not
635 request additional information from the applicant more than
636 three times, unless the applicant waives the limitation in
637 writing.
638 2.(b) If a municipality makes a request for additional
639 information and the applicant submits the required additional
640 information within 30 days after receiving the request, the
641 municipality must review the application for completeness and
642 issue a letter indicating that all required information has been
643 submitted or specify with particularity any areas that are
644 deficient within 30 days after receiving the additional
645 information.
646 3.(c) If a municipality makes a second request for
647 additional information and the applicant submits the required
648 additional information within 30 days after receiving the
649 request, the municipality must review the application for
650 completeness and issue a letter indicating that all required
Page 26 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
651 information has been submitted or specify with particularity any
652 areas that are deficient within 10 days after receiving the
653 additional information.
654 4.(d) Before a third request for additional information,
655 the applicant must be offered a meeting to attempt to resolve
656 outstanding issues. If a municipality makes a third request for
657 additional information and the applicant submits the required
658 additional information within 30 days after receiving the
659 request, the municipality must deem the application complete
660 within 10 days after receiving the additional information or
661 proceed to process the application for approval or denial unless
662 the applicant waived the municipality's limitation in writing as
663 described in paragraph (a).
664 5.(e) Except as provided in subsection (4) subsection (7),
665 if the applicant believes the request for additional information
666 is not authorized by ordinance, rule, statute, or other legal
667 authority, the municipality, at the applicant's request, shall
668 proceed to process the application for approval or denial.
669 (d)(4) A municipality must issue a refund to an applicant
670 equal to:
671 1.(a) Ten percent of the application fee if the
672 municipality fails to issue written notification of completeness
673 or written specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days
674 after receiving the application.
675 2.(b) Ten percent of the application fee if the
Page 27 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
676 municipality fails to issue written notification of completeness
677 or written specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days
678 after receiving the additional information pursuant to
679 subparagraph (c)2. paragraph (3)(b).
680 3.(c) Twenty percent of the application fee if the
681 municipality fails to issue written notification of completeness
682 or written specification of areas of deficiency within 10 days
683 after receiving the additional information pursuant to
684 subparagraph (c)3. paragraph (3)(c).
685 4.(d) Fifty percent of the application fee if the
686 municipality fails to approve, approves with conditions, or
687 denies the application within 30 days after conclusion of the
688 120-day timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)2. or the 180-day
689 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)3. subsection (2).
690 5.(e) One hundred percent of the application fee if the
691 municipality fails to approve, approves with conditions, or
692 denies an application 31 days or more after conclusion of the
693 120-day timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)2. or the 180-day
694 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)3. subsection (2).
695
696 A municipality is not required to issue a refund if the
697 applicant and the municipality agree to an extension of time,
698 the delay is caused by the applicant, or the delay is
699 attributable to a force majeure or other extraordinary
700 circumstance.
Page 28 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
701 (e)(5) When a municipality denies an application for a
702 development permit or development order, the municipality shall
703 give written notice to the applicant. The notice must include a
704 citation to the applicable portions of an ordinance, rule,
705 statute, or other legal authority for the denial of the permit
706 or order.
707 (3)(6) As used in this section, the terms "development
708 permit" and "development order" have the same meaning as in s.
709 163.3164, but do not include building permits.
710 (4)(7) For any development permit application filed with
711 the municipality after July 1, 2012, a municipality may not
712 require as a condition of processing or issuing a development
713 permit or development order that an applicant obtain a permit or
714 approval from any state or federal agency unless the agency has
715 issued a final agency action that denies the federal or state
716 permit before the municipal action on the local development
717 permit.
718 (5)(8) Issuance of a development permit or development
719 order by a municipality does not create any right on the part of
720 an applicant to obtain a permit from a state or federal agency
721 and does not create any liability on the part of the
722 municipality for issuance of the permit if the applicant fails
723 to obtain requisite approvals or fulfill the obligations imposed
724 by a state or federal agency or undertakes actions that result
725 in a violation of state or federal law. A municipality shall
Page 29 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
726 attach such a disclaimer to the issuance of development permits
727 and shall include a permit condition that all other applicable
728 state or federal permits be obtained before commencement of the
729 development.
730 (6)(9) This section does not prohibit a municipality from
731 providing information to an applicant regarding what other state
732 or federal permits may apply.
733 Section 4. Paragraphs (c) and (d) are added to subsection
734 (1) of section 177.071, Florida Statutes, to read:
735 177.071 Administrative approval of plats or replats by
736 designated county or municipal official.—
737 (1)
738 (c) A governing body and its designated administrative
739 authority shall use, upon the written request of the applicant,
740 the registry established in s. 163.3169 to supplement local
741 government staff resources in ways determined by the governing
742 body for processing and expediting the requirements of this
743 section.
744 (d) A local government may not create, establish, or apply
745 any additional local procedure or condition for the
746 administrative approval of a plat or replat under this section
747 which is inconsistent with this section or s. 177.091. If
748 infrastructure financial assurances are required as a condition
749 of plat or replat approval, the administrative authority
750 designated in paragraph (a) must receive and act upon the
Page 30 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
751 proposed assurance. The local government shall accept commonly
752 used forms of financial assurance, including performance bonds,
753 letters of credit, and escrow agreements, provided that the
754 assurance is in a form reasonably acceptable to the local
755 government and issued by a financially responsible issuer
756 meeting objective, uniformly applied standards. Local government
757 review of such financial assurance shall be limited to verifying
758 that the amount, form, and issuer satisfy the requirements of s.
759 177.091(8) and (9) and the local government's uniformly applied
760 standards, and may not be used to unreasonably delay approval.
761 If the assurance is deficient, the local government must provide
762 written notice of deficiencies within 10 business days.
763 Section 5. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1), paragraphs (a)
764 and (b) of subsection (2), paragraph (a) of subsection (3),
765 subsection (4), paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (6), and
766 subsection (8) of section 177.073, Florida Statutes, are
767 amended, and paragraph (d) is added to subsection (2) of that
768 section, to read:
769 177.073 Expedited approval of residential building permits
770 before a final plat is recorded.—
771 (1) As used in this section, the term:
772 (a) "Applicant" means a homebuilder or developer who files
773 an application with the local governing body to identify the
774 percentage of planned homes, or the number of building permits,
775 that the local governing body must issue for a residential
Page 31 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
776 subdivision or one or more phases in a multiphased planned
777 community, subdivision, or planned community.
778 (2)(a) By October 1, 2024, the governing body of a county
779 that has 75,000 residents or more and any governing body of a
780 municipality that has 10,000 residents or more and 25 acres or
781 more of contiguous land that the local government has designated
782 in the local government's comprehensive plan and future land use
783 map as land that is agricultural or to be developed for
784 residential purposes shall create a program to expedite the
785 process for issuing building permits for residential
786 subdivisions or one or more phases in a multiphased planned
787 community, subdivision, or planned communities in accordance
788 with the Florida Building Code and this section before a final
789 plat is recorded with the clerk of the circuit court. The
790 expedited process must include an application for an applicant
791 to identify the percentage of planned homes, not to exceed 50
792 percent of the residential subdivision or a planned community,
793 or the number of building permits that the governing body must
794 issue for the residential subdivision or planned community. The
795 application or the local government's final approval may not
796 alter or restrict the applicant from receiving the number of
797 building permits requested, so long as the request does not
798 exceed 50 percent of the planned homes of the residential
799 subdivision or planned community or the number of building
800 permits. This paragraph does not:
Page 32 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
801 1. Restrict the governing body from issuing more than 50
802 percent of the building permits for the residential subdivision
803 or planned community.
804 2. Apply to a county subject to s. 380.0552.
805 (b) Subject to the requirements under paragraph (6)(b), a
806 governing body that had a program in place before July 1, 2023,
807 to expedite the building permit process, need only update its
808 their program to approve an applicant's written application to
809 issue up to 50 percent of the building permits for the
810 residential subdivision or planned community in order to comply
811 with this section. This paragraph does not restrict a governing
812 body from issuing more than 50 percent of the building permits
813 for the residential subdivision or planned community.
814 (d)1. If a governing body fails to adopt a program under
815 paragraph (a) or paragraph (c), or fails to update or modify an
816 existing program as required under paragraph (b), by the
817 applicable statutory deadline, the following will apply without
818 further action or approval by the governing body and
819 notwithstanding any conflicting local requirement:
820 a. The applicant has an unconditional, self-executing
821 right to use a qualified contractor of the applicant's choosing,
822 within the scope of the contractor's professional licensure and
823 as authorized under this section, to perform technical review
824 and certification necessary to support the issuance of up to 75
825 percent of the building permits for the residential subdivision
Page 33 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
826 or planned community, including one or more phases thereof,
827 before the final plat is recorded, provided the qualified
828 contractor does not have a conflict of interest. For the
829 purposes of this paragraph, the term "conflict of interest" has
830 the same meaning as in s. 112.312.
831 b. The governing body, local building official, and any
832 local government staff may not condition, delay, limit,
833 restrict, obstruct, or deny the applicant's use of a qualified
834 contractor under this paragraph. This paragraph does not
835 prohibit a local government from applying neutral, generally
836 applicable requirements relating to procurement, contracting,
837 insurance, indemnification, conflict-of-interest review,
838 credential verification, recordkeeping, or public safety,
839 provided such requirements do not materially impair or frustrate
840 the applicant's ability to use a qualified contractor as
841 authorized by this paragraph. Any local requirement that
842 directly conflicts with this paragraph is preempted to the
843 extent of the conflict.
844 c. The qualified contractor may perform all technical
845 review services within the scope of his or her licensure and
846 qualifications which are necessary to obtain such building
847 permits as specifically authorized under this section, including
848 preparing, reviewing, and submitting permit applications and
849 supporting plans, specifications, and documents, and providing
850 signed and sealed documents when required by law. The local
Page 34 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
851 building official must accept such submissions when prepared and
852 sealed by the qualified contractor as meeting any local
853 requirement that the submission be prepared or reviewed by local
854 government staff, and must review and issue the permits in
855 accordance with the Florida Building Code and applicable state
856 law. This paragraph does not limit the authority of the local
857 building official to review such submission by a qualified
858 contractor for compliance with the Florida Building Code and
859 applicable state law, to identify deficiencies, or to approve or
860 deny the permit in accordance with the law.
861 d. The governing body and the local building official may
862 not unreasonably require the applicant or the qualified
863 contractor to use a local government registry, rotation, or
864 shortlist, or any other selection or vetting process, which has
865 the effect of denying or materially delaying the applicant's use
866 of a qualified contractor under this section.
867 e. The unconditional right provided by this paragraph
868 becomes effective immediately upon the governing body's failure
869 to meet the applicable deadlines in paragraph (a) or paragraph
870 (c), continues in effect unless and until the governing body has
871 adopted or updated a program fully compliant with this section,
872 and may not be limited, impaired, or applied retroactively to
873 reduce the number or percentage of building permits the
874 applicant may obtain or is eligible to obtain under this
875 paragraph.
Page 35 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
876 2. This paragraph may not be construed to limit or impair
877 the authority of the local building official to enforce the
878 Florida Building Code, the Florida Fire Prevention Code, or
879 other applicable state laws and local laws of general
880 application in reviewing and issuing building permits; however,
881 the governing body and the local building official may not
882 impose any additional local procedures, prerequisites, or
883 substantive standards on the applicant or the qualified
884 contractor which have the effect of conditioning, delaying,
885 restricting, or denying the use of a qualified contractor as
886 authorized by this paragraph.
887 (3) A governing body shall create:
888 (a) A two-step application process for the adoption of a
889 preliminary plat, and for stabilized access roads that can
890 support emergency vehicles, inclusive of any plans, in order to
891 expedite the issuance of building permits under this section.
892 The application must allow an applicant to identify the
893 percentage of planned homes or the number of building permits
894 that the governing body must issue for the residential
895 subdivision, or planned community, or one or more phases of a
896 multiphased planned community or subdivision.
897 (4)(a) An applicant may use a private provider or
898 qualified contractor in the same manner as provided in pursuant
899 to s. 553.791 to expedite the application process for building
900 permits after a preliminary plat is approved under this section.
Page 36 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
901 (b) A governing body shall, upon the written request of
902 the applicant, use the qualified contractor registry established
903 in s. 163.3169 establish a registry of at least three qualified
904 contractors whom the governing body may use to supplement staff
905 resources in ways determined by the governing body for
906 processing and expediting the review of an application for a
907 preliminary plat or any plans related to such application. A
908 qualified contractor on the registry who is hired pursuant to
909 this section to review an application, or any part thereof, for
910 a preliminary plat, or any part thereof, may not have a conflict
911 of interest with the applicant. For purposes of this paragraph,
912 the term "conflict of interest" has the same meaning as in s.
913 112.312.
914 (6) The governing body must issue the number or percentage
915 of building permits requested by an applicant in accordance with
916 the Florida Building Code and this section, provided the
917 residential buildings or structures are unoccupied and all of
918 the following conditions are met:
919 (b) The applicant provides proof to the governing body
920 that the applicant has provided a copy of the approved
921 preliminary plat, along with the approved plans, to the relevant
922 electric, gas, water, and wastewater utilities. For purposes of
923 this paragraph, the term "approved plans" means plans approved
924 for design and permit review and does not include, and may not
925 be construed to require or imply, any certification,
Page 37 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
926 attestation, or confirmation of the completion of construction
927 of any subdivision or planned community infrastructure, or
928 improvements depicted in, referenced by, or required under such
929 plans, except for the construction of the minimum access and
930 roadway improvements required by the Florida Fire Prevention
931 Code for fire department access and operations, such as a
932 stabilized roadway for emergency access. No other subdivision or
933 planned community infrastructure or improvements may be required
934 to be constructed as a condition of building permit issuance or
935 approval authorized under this section.
936 1. A local government may not condition, delay, withhold,
937 or deny the issuance of any building permit authorized under
938 this section on:
939 a. The actual completion, substantial completion, or
940 physical installation of any subdivision or planned community
941 infrastructure, or improvements identified in the approved
942 preliminary plat or approved plans;
943 b. The submission, acceptance, or approval of any
944 certification of completion or similar documentation, including,
945 but not limited to, certificates of completion or substantial
946 completion, engineer's or architect's certifications of
947 completion, as-built or record drawings, pressure or compaction
948 test results, utility acceptance letters, service availability
949 letters, or similar confirmations of finished construction or
950 readiness for service; or
Page 38 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
951 c. Compliance with an environmental condition which is not
952 required by its land development regulations, a local government
953 comprehensive plan, a regulatory covenant or similar recorded
954 instrument, a decision or order by a local zoning board or other
955 quasi-judicial board, or by state law or federal law to obtain a
956 building permit.
957 2. This prohibition applies notwithstanding any ordinance,
958 resolution, policy, practice, permit condition, concurrency or
959 proportionate-share requirement, interlocal agreement, utility
960 policy or standard, or other local requirement to the contrary.
961 3. This paragraph may not be construed to prohibit a local
962 government from requiring documentation strictly necessary to
963 demonstrate compliance with the Florida Fire Prevention Code as
964 a condition of issuing building permits; however, such
965 documentation may not require the physical completion of the
966 subdivision or planned community infrastructure, or improvements
967 beyond what is expressly required to satisfy the Florida Fire
968 Prevention Code.
969
970 This paragraph may not be construed to relieve an applicant from
971 completing or installing any infrastructure or improvements as a
972 condition of issuance of a certificate of occupancy.
973 (c) The applicant holds a valid performance bond for up to
974 130 percent of the necessary improvements, as defined in s.
975 177.031(9), that have not been completed upon submission of the
Page 39 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/CS/HB 927, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
976 application under this section. For purposes of a master planned
977 community as defined in s. 163.3202(5)(b), a valid performance
978 bond is required on a phase-by-phase basis. For purposes of this
979 section, a local government may waive the bond requirement in
980 this paragraph through its program or on a case-by-case basis
981 upon request of the applicant.
982 (8) For purposes of this section, an applicant has a
983 vested right in a preliminary plat that has been approved by a
984 governing body for the earlier of at least 5 years or if all of
985 the following conditions are met:
986 (a) The applicant relies in good faith on the approved
987 preliminary plat or any amendments thereto.
988 (b) The applicant incurs obligations and expenses,
989 commences construction of the residential subdivision or planned
990 community, and is continuing in good faith with the development
991 of the property.
992 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 40 of 40
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb927 -04-er